app/polish.aff
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£O
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLI¦MY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£Y¦MY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLI¦CIE
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£Y¦CIE
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLI
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£Y
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£BYM
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£ABYM
#	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£OBYM	#nie-ort
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£BY¦
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£ABY¦
#	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£BY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£ABY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£OBY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLIBY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£YBY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLIBY¦CIE
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£YBY¦CIE
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,ARLIBY¦MY
	[^¡] [DMPW] R Z E Æ		>	-RZEÆ,AR£YBY¦MY

	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£EM	#bó¶æ
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£AM
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£E¦
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£A¦
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-¦Æ,D£
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£A
#	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£OM	#nie-ort
#	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£O¦	#nie-ort
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£O
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,ODLI¦MY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£Y¦MY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,ODLI¦CIE
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£Y¦CIE
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,ODLI
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£Y
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-¦Æ,D£BYM
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£ABYM
#	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£OBYM	#nie-ort
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-¦Æ,D£BY¦
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£ABY¦
#	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£OBY¦	#nie-ort
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-¦Æ,D£BY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£ABY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£OBY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,ODLIBY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£YBY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,ODLIBY¦CIE
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£YBY¦CIE
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,ODLIBY¦MY
	Ó ¦ Æ		>	-Ó¦Æ,OD£YBY¦MY
